Hawaii statutes.
§481-7 Rebates, refunds, etc. The
payment or allowance of rebates, refunds, commissions, or unearned discounts
whether in the form of money or otherwise or extending to certain purchasers,
special services, or privileges not extended to all purchasers purchasing upon
like terms and conditions, to the injury of a competitor and where the payment
or allowance tends to destroy competition, is an unfair practice and any
person, firm, or corporation resorting to such trade practice shall be subject
to injunction or suit for damages as provided in this chapter; provided that
this section shall not apply to dealings between a principal and agent under
the terms of a bona fide agency contract, nor to sales by an employer to the
employer's bona fide employees of any articles which are part of the stock. [L
1937, c 223, §7; am L 1941, c 175, §3; RL 1945, §9327; am L 1955, c 241, §1(d);
RL 1955, §205-8; HRS §481-7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next